Hawaii, session 2026, SB690.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: PART I SECTION 1. The legislature finds that reliable agricultural infrastructure that supports the State's land and water resources is the lifeline of Hawaii's agriculture industry.  Increasing drought events, rain bombs, wildfires, and other crises have highlighted the need for the timely repair and maintenance of the State's agricultural infrastructure.  Sufficient funding is necessary to maintain and improve the State's irrigation systems to ensure that Hawaii's crops receive a steady and dependable supply of water.  Additionally, funding to develop the infrastructure of agricultural lands would provide not only access and other support for local producers to become financially viable, but also new and innovative opportunities to grow the agriculture industry in the State. Accordingly, the purpose of this part is to appropriate funds for capital improvement projects for the agricultural infrastructure of the State. SECTION 2. The director of finance is authorized to issue general obligation bonds in the sum of $342,070,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary is appropriated for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the purpose of financing capital improvement projects as follows: 1.   To be expended by the department of agriculture: A.   Agricultural Infrastructure, Statewide Design and construction for improvements to the agricultural infrastructure of the State Total funding                               $2,200,000 B.   Honalo Marshalling Yard, Hawaii Design and construction for improvements to Honalo Marshalling Yard Total funding                               $2,500,000 C.   Kahuku Agricultural Park, Oahu Design and construction for miscellaneous improvements to Kahuku Agricultural Park Total funding                               $3,500,000 D.   Lower Hamakua Irrigation Ditch, Hawaii Design and construction for improvements to Lower Hamakua Irrigation Ditch Total funding                               $4,500,000 E.   Molokai Irrigation System, Molokai Design and construction for improvements to Molokai Irrigation System Total funding                               $2,000,000 F.   Non-agricultural and Agricultural Park Lands, Statewide Design and construction for improvements to non-agricultural and agricultural park lands Total funding                               $2,000,000 G.   Royal Kunia Agricultural Park, Oahu Design and construction for improvements to Royal Kunia Agricultural Park Total funding                              $25,000,000 H.   State Irrigation Systems, Statewide Design and construction for reservoir safety improvements to state irrigation systems Total funding                              $23,000,000 I.   Waimanalo Irrigation System, Oahu Design and construction for improvements to Waimanalo Irrigation System Total funding                               $2,500,000 J.   Waimea Irrigation System, Oahu Design and construction for improvements to Waimea Irrigation System Total funding                               $4,500,000 2.   To be expended by the agribusiness development corporation: A.   Galbraith Agricultural Lands, Oahu Design and construction for improvements to Galbraith agricultural lands Total funding                                 $500,000 B.   Kekaha Bridge, Kauai Design and construction for improvements to Kekaha Bridge Total funding                               $2,500,000 C.   Kekaha Irrigation System, Kauai Design and construction for improvements to Kekaha Irrigation System Total funding                               $6,470,000 D.   Lihue Agricultural Lands, Kauai Design and construction for improvements to agricultural lands in Lihue Total funding                              $64,000,000 E.   Slaughterhouse Facility, Oahu Design and construction for improvements to a slaughterhouse facility on Oahu Total funding                               $4,000,000 F.   Wahiawa Reclaimed Water Irrigation System, Oahu Design and construction for improvements to Wahiawa Reclaimed Water Irrigation System Total funding                             $178,000,000 G.   Waialua Agricultural Lands, Oahu Design and construction for improvements to agricultural lands in Waialua Total funding                               $9,100,000 H.   Waimea Agricultural Lands, Kauai Design and construction for improvements to agricultural lands in Waimea Total funding                               $1,300,000 I.   Water and Irrigation Infrastructure, Oahu Design and construction for improvements to the state water and irrigation infrastructure on Oahu Total funding                               $4,500,000 SECTION 3. The appropriation made for the capital improvement project authorized by this Act shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal biennium for which the appropriation is made; provided that all moneys from the appropriation unencumbered as of June 30, 2028, shall lapse as of that date. PART II SECTION 4. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $9,500,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the establishment, operation, and administration of a food and product innovation network. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the agribusiness development corporation for the purposes of this part. SECTION 5. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $4,411,426 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the retirement of outstanding debt on the Waiahole water system. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the agribusiness development corporation for the purposes of this Act. PART III SECTION 6. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________